Massachusetts, session 194th, S1605.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 244. The department of public health shall promulgate regulations for the annual
health inspection of food trucks. The department shall prescribe rules and regulations relative to
inspection schedules, documentation of inspections, standards for acceptable cleanliness and the
costs of such inspections.
SECTION 2. The department of public health shall promulgate the regulations set forth in
section 1 not later than 1 year after the enactment of this act.
of 1